Utah statutes.
53-6-204.   Time of application for admission to training program.

At the time a person is employed or appointed as a peace officer, the chief executive officer of the agency employing or appointing shall submit to a certified academy an application together with the required background information required under Section 53-6-203.



Renumbered and Amended by Chapter 234, 1993 General Session

